Hawaii, session 2025, HB754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in Hawaiʻi, community schools are innovative, thriving hubs of learning, in which partnerships and collaboration create aʻo mai, aʻo aku, places to learn, teach, or impart knowledge, and establish reciprocal relationships between learners and place, content and context, and schools and communities.  Community schools are needed to help align and leverage resources already in the community to address students' barriers to learning.  Through inclusive decision-making, a shared vision, actionable data, and trusting pilina, community schools focus on supporting students and families through the following key practices: (1)  Expanded enriched learning opportunities; (2)  Rigorous community-connected classroom instruction; (3)  Culture of belonging, safety, and care; (4)  Powerful family and student engagement; (5)  Integrated systems of support; (6)  Collaborative leadership, shared voice, and power; and (7)  Grounded in Hawaiʻi. The legislature further finds that community schools are a proven, time-tested strategy that can produce short-term results like improving family engagement and attendance and decreasing behavioral referrals.  It is also proven to produce long-term results like improving academic scores, school culture and climate, student enrollment, teacher retention, and graduation rates. A study on community schools in Albuquerque, New Mexico found that for every dollar invested in a community school coordinator returned approximately $7.11 of net benefits.  Another study on community schools in New York City found that community schools had positive and significant effects on on-time grade progression for elementary and middle school students, and high school graduation rates.  A recent report by the Learning Policy Institute cited community schools as a promising approach to improving attendance because they can create the conditions needed for learning. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of education to support community schools. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,285,655 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and $2,703,491 for fiscal year 2026-2027 for community schools, including for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) program manager in the department of education. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.